New Jersey, session 222, A3400.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    Section 7 of P.L.1968, c.303 (C.34:13A-5.3) is amended to read as follows: 7.    Except as hereinafter provided, public employees shall have, and shall be protected in the exercise of, the right, freely and without fear of penalty or reprisal, to form, join and assist any employee organization or to refrain from any such activity; provided, however, that this right shall not extend to elected officials, members of boards and commissions, managerial executives, or confidential employees, except in a school district the term managerial executive shall mean the superintendent of schools or [his] the superintendents equivalent, nor, except where established practice, prior agreement or special circumstances dictate the contrary, shall any supervisor having the power to hire, discharge, discipline, or to effectively recommend the same, have the right to be represented in collective negotiations by an employee organization that admits nonsupervisory personnel to membership, and the fact that any organization has such supervisory employees as members shall not deny the right of that organization to represent the appropriate unit in collective negotiations; and provided further, that, except where established practice, prior agreement, or special circumstances dictate the contrary, no policeman shall have the right to join an employee organization that admits employees other than policemen to membership.  The negotiating unit shall be defined with due regard for the community of interest among the employees concerned, but the commission shall not intervene in matters of recognition and unit definition except in the event of a dispute. Representatives designated or selected by public employees for the purposes of collective negotiation by the majority of the employees in a unit appropriate for such purposes, by the majority of the employees voting in an election conducted by the commission as authorized by [this act] P.L.1968, c.303 (C.34:13A-1 et al.), or, at the option of the representative in a case in which the commission finds that only one representative is seeking to be the majority representative, by a majority of the employees in the unit signing authorization cards indicating their preference for that representative, shall be the exclusive representatives for collective negotiation concerning the terms and conditions of employment of the employees in such unit.  An authorization card indicating preference shall not be valid unless it is printed in a language understood by the [employees] employee who signs it. Nothing herein shall be construed to prevent any official from meeting with an employee organization for the purpose of hearing the views and requests of its members in such unit so long as (a) the majority representative is informed of the meeting; (b) any changes or modifications in terms and conditions of employment are made only through negotiation with the majority representative; and (c) a minority organization shall not present or process grievances.  Nothing herein shall be construed to deny to any individual employee [his] the employees rights under Civil Service laws or regulations.  When no majority representative has been selected as the bargaining agent for the unit of which an individual employee is a part, [he] the employee may present [his] the employees own grievance either personally or through an appropriate representative or an organization of which [he] the employee is a member and have such grievance adjusted. A majority representative of public employees in an appropriate unit shall be entitled to act for and to negotiate agreements covering all employees in the unit and shall be responsible for representing the interest of all such employees without discrimination and without regard to employee organization membership. Proposed new rules or modifications of existing rules governing working conditions shall be negotiated with the majority representative before they are established. In addition, the majority representative and designated representatives of the public employer shall meet at reasonable times and negotiate in good faith with respect to grievances, disciplinary disputes, and other terms and conditions of employment.  With respect to firefighters and fire officers, terms and conditions of employment shall include the minimum number of sworn firefighters and fire officers assigned to each fire apparatus provided that the staffing levels are rationally related to employee or public safety.  Nothing herein shall be construed as permitting negotiation of the standards or criteria for employee performance. When an agreement is reached on the terms and conditions of employment, it shall be embodied in writing and signed by the authorized representatives of the public employer and the majority representative. Public employers shall negotiate written policies setting forth grievance and disciplinary review procedures by means of which their employees or representatives of employees may appeal the interpretation, application or violation of policies, agreements, and administrative decisions, including disciplinary determinations, affecting them, provided that such grievance and disciplinary review procedures shall be included in any agreement entered into between the public employer and the representative organization.  Such grievance and disciplinary review procedures may provide for binding arbitration as a means for resolving disputes.  Except as otherwise provided herein, the procedures agreed to by the parties may not replace or be inconsistent with any alternate statutory appeal procedure nor may they provide for binding arbitration of disputes involving the discipline of employees with statutory protection under tenure or civil service laws, except that such procedures may provide for binding arbitration of disputes involving the minor discipline of any public employees protected under the provisions of section 7 of P.L.1968, c.303 (C.34:13A-5.3), other than public employees subject to discipline pursuant to R.S.53:1-10.  Grievance and disciplinary review procedures established by agreement between the public employer and the representative organization shall be utilized for any dispute covered by the terms of such agreement.  For the purposes of this section, minor discipline shall mean a suspension or fine of less than five days unless the employee has been suspended or fined an aggregate of 15 or more days or received more than three suspensions or fines of five days or less in one calendar year. Where the State of New Jersey and the majority representative have agreed to a disciplinary review procedure that provides for binding arbitration of disputes involving the major discipline of any public employee protected under the provisions of this section, other than public employees subject to discipline pursuant to R.S.53:1-10, the grievance and disciplinary review procedures established by agreement between the State of New Jersey and the majority representative shall be utilized for any dispute covered by the terms of such agreement. For the purposes of this section, major discipline shall mean a removal, disciplinary demotion, suspension or fine of more than five days, or less where the aggregate number of days suspended or fined in any one calendar year is 15 or more days or unless the employee received more than three suspensions or fines of five days or less in one calendar year. In interpreting the meaning and extent of a provision of a collective negotiation agreement providing for grievance arbitration, a court or agency shall be bound by a presumption in favor of arbitration.  Doubts as to the scope of an arbitration clause shall be resolved in favor of requiring arbitration. Nothing in P.L.    , c.     (C. )(pending before the Legislature as this bill) shall be construed as affecting, reducing, limiting, or curtailing any rights or obligations of any public employer other than the firefighter and fire officer personnel explicitly covered by the New Jersey Employer-Employee Relations Act, P.L.1941, c.100 (C.34:13A-1 et seq.). (cf: P.L.2005, c.380, s.1) 2.    Section 1 of P.L.1974, c.123 (C.34:13A-5.4) is amended to read as follows: 1. a. Public employers, their representatives or agents are prohibited from: (1)   Interfering with, restraining or coercing employees in the exercise of the rights guaranteed to them by [this act] P.L.1974, c.123 (C.34:13A-5.4 et seq.). (2)   Dominating or interfering with the formation, existence or administration of any employee organization. (3)   Discriminating in regard to hire or tenure of employment or any term or condition of employment to encourage or discourage employees in the exercise of the rights guaranteed to them by [this act] P.L.1974, c.123 (C.34:13A-5.4 et seq.). (4)   Discharging or otherwise discriminating against any employee because [he] the employee has signed or filed an affidavit, petition or complaint or given any information or testimony under [this act] P.L.1974, c.123 (C.34:13A-5.4 et seq.). (5)   Refusing to negotiate in good faith with a majority representative of employees in an appropriate unit concerning terms and conditions of employment of employees in that unit, or refusing to process grievances presented by the majority representative. (6)   Refusing to reduce a negotiated agreement to writing and to sign such agreement. (7)   Violating any of the rules and regulations established by the commission. b.    Employee organizations, their representatives or agents are prohibited from: (1)   Interfering with, restraining or coercing employees in the exercise of the rights guaranteed to them by [this act] P.L.1974, c.123 (C.34:13A-5.4 et seq.). (2)   Interfering with, restraining or coercing a public employer in the selection of [his] the employers representative for the purposes of negotiations or the adjustment of grievances. (3) Refusing to negotiate in good faith with a public employer, if they are the majority representative of employees in an appropriate unit concerning terms and conditions of employment of employees in that unit. (4)   Refusing to reduce a negotiated agreement to writing and to sign such agreement. (5)   Violating any of the rules and regulations established by the commission. c.     The commission shall have exclusive power as hereinafter provided to prevent anyone from engaging in any unfair practice listed in subsections a. and b. above.  Whenever it is charged that anyone has engaged or is engaging in any such unfair practice, the commission, or any designated agent thereof, shall have authority to issue and cause to be served upon such party a complaint stating the specific unfair practice charged and including a notice of hearing containing the date and place of hearing before the commission or any designated agent thereof; provided that no complaint shall issue based upon any unfair practice occurring more than six months prior to the filing of the charge unless the person aggrieved thereby was prevented from filing such charge in which event the six-month period shall be computed from the day [he] the person was no longer so prevented. In any such proceeding, the provisions of the "Administrative Procedure Act," P.L.1968, c.410 (C.52:14B-1 et seq.) shall be applicable.  Evidence shall be taken at the hearing and filed with the commission.  If, upon all the evidence taken, the commission shall determine that any party charged has engaged or is engaging in any such unfair practice, the commission shall state its findings of fact and conclusions of law and issue and cause to be served on such party an order requiring such party to cease and desist from such unfair practice, and to take such reasonable affirmative action as will effectuate the policies of this act.  All cases in which a complaint and notice of hearing on a charge is actually issued by the commission, shall be prosecuted before the commission or its agent, or both, by the representative of the employee organization or party filing the charge or [his] the partys authorized representative. d.    The commission shall at all times have the power and duty, upon the request of any public employer or majority representative, to make a determination as to whether a matter in dispute is within the scope of collective negotiations.  The commission shall serve the parties with its findings of fact and conclusions of law.  Any determination made by the commission pursuant to this subsection may be appealed to the Appellate Division of the Superior Court.  With respect to firefighters and fire officers, if there is a dispute between a majority representative of a unit of sworn fire personnel and a public employer regarding whether the minimum number of sworn fire personnel assigned to a fire apparatus is a management prerogative or rationally relates to public or employee safety and therefore a mandatory subject of negotiations, the matter shall be submitted to the commission for an evidentiary hearing.  If the matter involves a grievance arbitration, the commission may refer the issue regarding the scope of negotiations to the arbitrator to decide as a preliminary matter.  If the arbitrator determines that the issue rationally relates to public or employee safety, the arbitrator may decide the merits of the grievance.  In either proceeding, the burden of proof shall be by a preponderance of the evidence and shall be on the party asserting that the matter rationally relates to public or employee safety. e.     The commission shall adopt such rules as may be required to regulate the conduct of representation elections, and to regulate the time of commencement of negotiations and of institution of impasse procedures so that there will be full opportunity for negotiations and the resolution of impasses prior to required budget submission dates. f.     The commission or any interested party shall have the power to apply to the Superior Court, Law Division, for an appropriate order enforcing any order of the commission issued under subsection c. or d. hereof, and its findings of fact, if based upon substantial evidence on the record as a whole, shall not, in such action, be set aside or modified; any order for remedial or affirmative action, if reasonably designed to effectuate the purposes of this act, shall be affirmed and enforced in such proceeding. g.    The Director of the Division of Local Government Services in the Department of Community Affairs may notify the commission that a municipality deemed a "municipality in need of stabilization and recovery" pursuant to section 4 of P.L.2016, c.4 (C.52:27BBBB-4) shall not be subject to the commission's authority to prevent an unfair practice pursuant to subsection a. of this section.  Upon such notice, neither the commission, nor any designee, shall have the authority to issue or cause to be served upon such municipality in need of stabilization and recovery any complaint alleging an unfair practice under subsection a. of this section or to hold any hearings with respect thereto.  Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to limit the scope of any general or specific powers of the Local Finance Board or the Director set forth in P.L.2016, c.4 (C.52:27BBBB-1 et al.). The provisions of this subsection shall no longer be applicable on and after the first day of the sixth year next following the determination by the Commissioner of Community Affairs that the municipality shall be deemed "a municipality in need of stabilization and recovery" pursuant to section 4 of P.L.2016, c.4 (C.52:27BBBB-4); however, actions taken pursuant to this subsection prior to the effective date of P.L.2021, c.124 (C.52:27BBBB-4 et al.) shall be final and shall not be subject to reconsideration. h.    Nothing in P.L.    , c.    (pending before the Legislature as this bill) shall be construed as affecting, reducing, limiting, or curtailing any rights or obligations of any public employer other than the firefighter and fire officer personnel explicitly covered by the New Jersey Employer-Employee Relations Act, P.L.1941, c.100 (C.34:13A-1 et seq.). (cf: P.L.2021, c.411, s.10) 3.    This act shall take effect immediately and shall apply to all contracts entered into or renewed on or after the effective date of this act.